Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 10
SOLID WASTE-TO-ENERGY INCINERATION SYSTEMS

Cross references:

For the calculation by the public utilities commission of avoided cost information prior to construction of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system, see § 40-3-112; for authority for counties to develop solid waste-to-energy systems, see part 9 of article 20 of title 30.

Law reviews:

For article, "The Legal Structure and Financing of Waste-to-Energy Projects - Part 1", see 14

C

olo. Law. 574 (1985).

31-15-1001. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that methods for the efficient and economical production of usable energy should be achieved whenever possible and that the use of flammable waste material for the conversion of heat into steam, electrical power, or any other form of energy could provide energy in an efficient and economical manner. For such purposes, the provisions of this part 10 are enacted to authorize municipalities to develop this type of energy for their own use and the use of the public.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1243, § 3, effective May 31.

31-15-1002. Definitions.

As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Solid waste-to-energy incineration system" means the use of flammable waste material as a primary or supplemental fuel for the conversion of heat into steam, electrical power, or any other form of energy.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1243, § 3, effective May 31.

31-15-1003. Municipal authority relating to solid waste-to-energy incineration systems.

The governing body of any municipality has the power to:

Acquire, hold, use, transfer, and convey any real or personal property for the purpose of developing and operating a solid waste-to-energy incineration system;

Engage in any activities relating to the siting, development, and operation of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system and to the production, distribution, and sale of energy from such system;

Issue revenue bonds authorized by action of the city council or comparable legislative body, without the approval of the qualified electors of the municipality, for purposes of financing the siting and development of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system and the production, distribution, and marketing of energy from such systems. Such revenue bonds shall be issued in the manner provided in part 4 of article 35 of this title for the issuance of revenue bonds by municipalities; except that such revenue bonds may be sold in one or more series at par, or below or above par, at public or private sale, in such manner and for such price as the municipality, in its discretion, shall determine. Such revenue bonds and interest coupons, if any, appurtenant thereto shall never constitute the debt or indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any provision or limitation of the state constitution, statutes, or home rule charter and shall not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers. Such revenue bonds and the income therefrom are exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Enter into contracts, including intergovernmental contracts pursuant to section 29-1-203, C.R.S., relating to the acts authorized by this part 10;

Establish such terms and conditions by contract, ordinance, or any other method for the siting, development, and operation of a solid waste-to-energy incineration system and the production, distribution, and sale of energy from such system;

Set, maintain, and revise charges for the disposal of solid waste at a solid waste-to-energy incineration system facility and for the distribution and sale of energy from such system for the purpose of financing the property, facilities, and operation of the system;

Exercise any other powers which are essential in performing the acts authorized by this part 10;

Perform any nonlegislative acts authorized by this part 10 by means of an agent or by contract with any person, firm, or corporation.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1243, § 3, effective May 31.

31-15-1004. Department of public health and environment rules.

The department of public health and environment may promulgate rules for the engineering design and operation of solid waste-to-energy incineration systems, and any such system shall comply with such rules before beginning operations.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire part added, p. 1244, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2802, § 565, effective July 1.